West Virginia, session 2026, HB4055.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: §1. Repeal of section prohibiting execution of process on Sunday. That §56-3-16 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed. NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to repeal the code prohibiting civil process on Sunday.  Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home